Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2656
Preservation of estate plan.

In investing the estate, and in selecting assets of the estate for distribution under subsections (a) and (b) of section 30-2654, in utilizing powers of revocation or withdrawal available for the support of the protected person, and exercisable by the conservator or the court, the conservator and the court should take into account any known estate plan of the protected person, including his will, any revocable trust of which he is settlor, and any contract, transfer or joint ownership arrangement with provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at his death to another or others which he may have originated. The conservator may examine the will of the protected person.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 274, UPC § 5-427.